Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.350

Acceptance of federal funds authorized.

The director is authorized to receive federal funds now available or hereafter made available for the assistance and improvement of public personnel administration, which may be expended in addition to the personnel service fund established by RCW 41.06.280.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 421; 2002 c 354 s 218; 1993 c 281 s 36; 1969 ex.s. c 152 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.